Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-106
Executive director; qualifications; salary; duties; fees for transcripts.

Any person who is eligible to hold the office of commissioner shall also be eligible to hold the office of executive director. The salary of the executive director shall be fixed by the commission, payable monthly. The executive director shall take the same oath as the commissioners. The executive director shall keep full and correct minutes of all transactions and proceedings of the commission, and it shall be his or her duty to, upon request and being paid the lawful fees therefor, furnish a transcript, duly authenticated by the commission, of any public record of the commission and to perform such duties as may be required by the commission. The executive director shall charge such fees for furnishing a transcript as are allowed by law on appeal from the district court to the Court of Appeals and shall turn such fees into the fund provided for the expenses of the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 6, p. 1356;

Laws 1965, c. 445, § 1, p. 1414;

Laws 1967, c. 478, § 1, p. 1474;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 128;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 29.